North Carolina statutes. Chapter 97. Workers’ Compensation Act.
Article 2. Compensation Rating and Inspection Bureau. [Repealed]

§§ 97-102 through 97-104.6.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 828, s. 8, as amended by Session Laws 1979, c. 824, s. 8.

Cross References.

As to the North Carolina Rate Bureau, see

G.S. 58-36-1

et seq.

As to the regulation of insurance rates, see

G.S. 58-40-1

et seq.